Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1525.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 2232, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2232. The Commission, through the Oklahoma Tourism and
Recreation Department, may sponsor, promote, and implement an annual
statewide tourism and recreation industry conference to promote the
tourism and recreation industry. The Department is authorized to
may partner with private entities for the administration and
execution of the conference. The Department may enter into
contracts or agreements pursuant to this section on a fair and
reasonable basis in compliance with paragraph 10 of subsection C of
Section 85.5 of this title in an amount not to exceed Seventy-five
Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00). The Department is hereby authorized
to may charge registration and exhibit space fees necessary to cover
the costs of the conference and shall deposit the fees plus any
other conference proceeds, including donated funds, into an agency
special account to be created by the Special Agency Account Board.

Expenditure of monies from the agency special account shall be for
purposes incidental to the tourism and recreation industry
conference, and shall be approved by the Commission Executive
Director.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1525 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 4th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1525 Page 3